Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1532.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 51 O.S. 2021, Section 24A.5, as


last amended by Section 2, Chapter 404, O.S.L. 2025 (51 O.S. Supp.


2025, Section 24A.5), is amended to read as follows:


Section 24A.5. All records of public bodies and public


officials shall be open to any person for inspection, copying, or


mechanical reproduction during regular business hours; provided:





Req. No. 3550 Page 1


1. The Oklahoma Open Records Act, Sections 24A.1 through 24A.34


24A.40 of this title, does not apply to records specifically


required by law to be kept confidential including:


a. records protected by a state evidentiary privilege


such as the attorney-client privilege, the work


product immunity from discovery and the identity of


informer privileges,


b. records of what transpired during meetings of a public


body lawfully closed to the public such as executive


sessions authorized under the Oklahoma Open Meeting


Act,


c. personal information within driver records as defined


by the Driver’s Privacy Protection Act, 18 U.S.C.,


Sections 2721 through 2725,


d. information in the files of the Board of Medicolegal


Investigations obtained pursuant to Sections 940 and


941 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes that may be


hearsay, preliminary unsubstantiated investigation-


related findings, or confidential medical information,


e. any test forms, question banks, and answer keys


developed for state licensure examinations, but


specifically excluding test preparation materials or


study guides,



Req. No. 3550 Page 2


f. last names, addresses, Social Security numbers or tax


identification numbers, and proof of identification


submitted to the Oklahoma Lottery Commission by


persons claiming a lottery prize,


g. unless public disclosure is required by other laws or


regulations, vehicle movement records of the Oklahoma


Transportation Turnpike Authority obtained in


connection with the Authority’s electronic toll


collection system,


h. personal financial information, credit reports, or


other financial data obtained by or submitted to a


public body for the purpose of evaluating credit


worthiness, obtaining a license, permit, or for the


purpose of becoming qualified to contract with a


public body,


i. any digital audio/video audio or video recordings of


the toll collection and safeguarding activities of the


Oklahoma Transportation Turnpike Authority,


j. any personal information provided by a guest at any


facility owned or operated by the Oklahoma Tourism and


Recreation Department to obtain any service at the


facility or by a purchaser of a product sold by or


through the Oklahoma Tourism and Recreation


Department,

Req. No. 3550 Page 3


k. a United States Department of Defense Form 214 (DD


Form 214) filed with a county clerk, including any DD


Form 214 filed before July 1, 2002,


l. except as provided for in Section 2-110 of Title 47 of


the Oklahoma Statutes:


(1) any record in connection with a Motor Vehicle


Report issued by the Department of Public Safety,


as prescribed in Section 6-117 of Title 47 of the


Oklahoma Statutes, or


(2) personal information within driver records, as


defined by the Driver’s Privacy Protection Act,


U.S.C., Sections 2721 through 2725, which are


stored and maintained by the Department of Public


Safety,


m. any portion of any document or information provided to


an agency or entity of the state or a political


subdivision to obtain licensure under the laws of this


state or a political subdivision that contains an


applicant’s personal address, personal phone number,


personal email address, any government-issued


identification numbers, or other contact information;


provided, however, lists of persons licensed, the


existence of a license of a person, or a business or


commercial address, or other business or commercial

Req. No. 3550 Page 4


information disclosable under state law submitted with


an application for licensure shall be public record,


unless the business or commercial address is the same


as the applicant’s personal address, except when the


applicant permits in writing the disclosure of the


address,


n. an investigative file obtained during an investigation


conducted by the State Department of Health into


violations of the Long-Term Care Administrator


Licensing Act under Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes,


or


o. documents, evidence, materials, records, reports,


complaints, or other information in the possession or


control of the Attorney General or Insurance


Department pertaining to an evaluation, examination,


investigation, or review made pursuant to the


provisions of the Patient’s Right to Pharmacy Choice


Act, the Pharmacy Audit Integrity Act, or Sections 357


through 360 of Title 59 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


2. All Social Security numbers included in a record may be


confidential regardless of the person’s status as a public employee


or private individual and may be redacted or deleted prior to


release of the record by the public body;



Req. No. 3550 Page 5


3. Any reasonably segregable portion of a record containing


exempt material shall be provided after deletion of the exempt


portions; provided, however, the Department of Public Safety shall


not be required to assemble for the requesting person specific


information, in any format, from driving records relating to any


person whose name and date of birth or whose driver license number


is not furnished by the requesting person.


The Oklahoma State Bureau of Investigation shall not be required


to assemble for the requesting person any criminal history records


relating to persons whose names, dates of birth, and other


identifying information required by the Oklahoma State Bureau of


Investigation pursuant to administrative rule are not furnished by


the requesting person;


4. Any request for a record which contains individual records


of persons, and the cost of copying, reproducing or certifying each


individual record is otherwise prescribed by state law, the cost may


be assessed for each individual record, or portion thereof requested


as prescribed by state law. Otherwise, a public body may charge a


fee only for recovery of the reasonable, direct costs of record


copying, or mechanical reproduction. Notwithstanding any state or


local provision to the contrary, in no instance shall the record


copying fee exceed twenty-five cents ($0.25) per page for records


having the dimensions of eight and one-half (8 1/2) by fourteen (14)



Req. No. 3550 Page 6


inches or smaller, or a maximum of One Dollar ($1.00) per copied


page for a certified copy. However, if the request:


a. is solely for commercial purpose, or


b. would clearly cause excessive disruption of the


essential functions of the public body,


then the public body may charge a reasonable fee to recover the


direct cost of record search and copying; however, publication in a


newspaper or broadcast by news media for news purposes shall not


constitute a resale or use of a record for trade or commercial


purpose and charges for providing copies of electronic data to the


news media for a news purpose shall not exceed the direct cost of


making the copy. The fee charged by the Department of Public Safety


for a copy in a computerized format of a record of the Department


shall not exceed the direct cost of making the copy unless the fee


for the record is otherwise set by law. A public body may require


advance payment of the estimated fees authorized under this section


when the estimated cost exceeds Seventy-five Dollars ($75.00) or if


the requestor has outstanding fees from previous requests. Any


portion of an advance payment that exceeds the costs of responding


to the request shall be returned to the requestor.


Any public body establishing fees under the Oklahoma Open


Records Act shall post a written schedule of the fees at its


principal office and with the county clerk.



Req. No. 3550 Page 7


In no case shall a search fee be charged when the release of


records is in the public interest, including, but not limited to,


release to the news media, scholars, authors and taxpayers seeking


to determine whether those entrusted with the affairs of the


government are honestly, faithfully, and competently performing


their duties as public servants.


The fees shall not be used for the purpose of discouraging


requests for information or as obstacles to disclosure of requested


information;


5. The land description tract index of all recorded instruments


concerning real property required to be kept by the county clerk of


any county shall be available for inspection or copying in


accordance with the provisions of the Oklahoma Open Records Act;


provided, however, the index shall not be copied or mechanically


reproduced for the purpose of sale of the information;


6. A public body must provide prompt, reasonable access to its


records but may establish reasonable procedures which protect the


integrity and organization of its records and to prevent excessive


disruptions of its essential functions. A delay in providing access


to records shall be limited solely to the time required for


preparing the requested documents and the avoidance of excessive


disruptions of the public body’s essential functions. In no event


may production of a current request for records be unreasonably


delayed until after completion of a prior records request that will

Req. No. 3550 Page 8


take substantially longer than the current request. Any public body


which makes the requested records available on the Internet shall


meet the obligation of providing prompt, reasonable access to its


records as required by this paragraph;


7. A public body may require a requestor to complete a records


request form that includes the full name and contact information of


the requestor. If a records request does not describe the requested


records with reasonable specificity, a public body may ask the


requestor to clarify the request. To have reasonable specificity, a


request shall:


a. specify a general time frame within which the


requested records would have been created or


transmitted,


b. seek identifiable records, rather than general


information without any qualifiers or other


specifications, and


c. include search terms that are sufficiently specific to


assist the public body in identifying the requested


records.


If a public body has engaged with the requestor to seek the


information needed to fulfill the request and to identify the


records sought by the requestor, including providing the requestor


with general topics or a specific list of records related to the



Req. No. 3550 Page 9


request, the request may be denied if it is still not reasonably


specific; and


8. A public body shall designate certain persons who are


authorized to release records of the public body for inspection,


copying, or mechanical reproduction. At least one person shall be


available at all times to release records during the regular


business hours of the public body.


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 51 O.S. 2021, Section 24A.7, as


amended by Section 2, Chapter 307, O.S.L. 2022 (51 O.S. Supp. 2025,


Section 24A.7), is amended to read as follows:


Section 24A.7. A. At the sole discretion of the public body, a


public body may keep personnel records confidential:


1. Which relate to internal personnel investigations including


examination and selection material for employment, hiring,


appointment, promotion, demotion, discipline, or resignation; or


2. Where disclosure would constitute a clearly unwarranted


invasion of personal privacy such as employee evaluations, payroll


deductions, timekeeping and badge entrance information, employment


applications submitted by persons not hired by the public body, and


transcripts from institutions of higher education maintained in the


personnel files of certified public school employees; provided,


however, that nothing in this subsection shall be construed to


exempt from disclosure the degree obtained and the curriculum on the


transcripts of certified public school employees.

Req. No. 3550 Page 10


B. All personnel records not specifically falling within the


exceptions provided in subsection A or D of this section shall be


available for public inspection and copying including, but not


limited to, records of:


1. An employment application of a person who becomes a public


official;


2. The gross receipts of public funds;


3. The dates of employment, title or position; and


4. Any final disciplinary action resulting in loss of pay,


suspension, demotion of position or termination.


C. Except as may otherwise be made confidential by statute, an


employee of a public body shall have a right of access to his or her


own personnel file.


D. The home addresses, home telephone numbers, Social Security


numbers, private email addresses, and private mobile phone numbers


of current and former public employees shall not be open to public


inspection or disclosure; provided, however, that nothing in this


subsection shall be construed to exempt from disclosure public


records created using a private email address or private mobile


phone.


E. Except as otherwise required by Section 6-101.16 of Title 70


of the Oklahoma Statutes, public bodies shall keep confidential all


records created pursuant to the Oklahoma Teacher and Leader


Effectiveness Evaluation System (TLE) which identify a current or

Req. No. 3550 Page 11


former public employee and contain any evaluation, observation or


other TLE record of such employee.


SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-3550 BLB 1/12/2026 2:37:33 PM







































Req. No. 3550 Page 12